North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-30 Miscellaneous Rules of Practice in District Courts [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

28-30-01.
Process — Service — Endorsement by attorney. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 4, 11.

28-30-02.
Process — Pleadings and papers — Numbering and paging. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-30-03.
Stipulations. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-30-04.
Copy of lost papers. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-30-05.
Undertakings — Where filed. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

Note.

Although this section has been superseded by the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, part of this section was preserved in section 32-07-07 by inserting the words “and the undertaking to the plaintiff” in such section.

28-30-06.
Failure to comply with the statutes. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.